Utah statutes.
57-11-18.   Dispositions subject to chapter -- Jurisdiction of district courts.

Dispositions of subdivided lands are subject to this act, and the district courts of this state have jurisdiction in claims or causes of action arising under this act, if:

(1)  The subdivided lands offered for disposition are located in this state;

(2)  The subdivider's principal office is located in this state; or

(3)  Any offer or disposition of subdivided lands is made in this state, whether or not the offeror or offeree is then present in this state, if the offer originates within this state or is directed by the offeror to a person or place in this state and received by the person or at the place to which it is directed.

